Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.410.200

Washington professional educator standards board—Creation—Membership—Executive director.

(1)(a) The Washington professional educator standards board is created, consisting of twelve members to be appointed by the governor to four-year terms and the superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent's designee. On August 1, 2009, the board shall be reduced to twelve members.

(b) Vacancies on the board shall be filled by appointment or reappointment by the governor to terms of four years.

(c) No person may serve as a member of the board for more than two consecutive full four-year terms.

(d) The governor shall biennially appoint the chair of the board. No board member may serve as chair for more than four consecutive years.

(2) A majority of the members of the board shall be active practitioners with the majority being classroom based. Membership on the board shall include individuals having one or more of the following:

(a) Experience in one or more of the education roles for which state preparation program approval is required and certificates issued;

(b) Experience providing or leading a state-approved teacher or educator preparation program;

(c) Experience providing mentoring and coaching to education professionals or others; and

(d) Education-related community experience.

(3) In appointing board members, the governor shall consider the individual's commitment to quality education and the ongoing improvement of instruction, experiences in the public schools or private schools, involvement in developing quality teaching preparation and support programs, and vision for the most effective yet practical system of assuring teaching quality. The governor shall also consider the diversity of the population of the state.

(4) All appointments to the board made by the governor are subject to confirmation by the senate.

(5) Each member of the board shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in carrying out the duties of the board in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(6) The governor may remove a member of the board for neglect of duty, misconduct, malfeasance or misfeasance in office, or for incompetency or unprofessional conduct as defined in chapter 18.130 RCW. In such a case, the governor shall file with the secretary of state a statement of the causes for and the order of removal from office, and the secretary of state shall send a certified copy of the statement of causes and order of removal to the last known post office address of the member.

(7) Members of the board shall hire an executive director and an administrative assistant to reside in the office of the superintendent of public instruction for administrative purposes only.

(8) Members of the board may create informal advisory groups as needed to inform the board's work.

[ 2017 c 189 s 1; 2009 c 531 s 2; 2005 c 497 s 202; 2003 1st sp.s. c 22 s 1; 2002 c 92 s 1; 2000 c 39 s 102.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 531 s 2: "Section 2 of this act takes effect August 1, 2009." [ 2009 c 531 s 5.]

Intent—Part headings not law—Effective date—2005 c 497: See notes following RCW 28A.305.011.

Findings—2000 c 39: "The legislature finds and declares:

(1) Creation of a public body whose focus is educator quality would be likely to bring greater focus and attention to the profession;

(2) Professional educator standards boards are consumer protection boards, establishing assessment policies to ensure the public that its new practitioners have the knowledge to be competent;

(3) The highest possible standards for all educators are essential in ensuring attainment of high academic standards by all students;

(4) Teacher assessment for certification can guard against admission to the teaching profession of persons who have not demonstrated that they are knowledgeable in the subjects they will be assigned to teach; and

(5) Teacher assessment for certification should be implemented as an additional element to the system of teacher preparation and certification." [ 2000 c 39 s 101.]

Part headings and section captions not law—2000 c 39: "Part headings and section captions used in this act are not any part of the law." [ 2000 c 39 s 301.]

Joint report to the legislature: RCW 28A.305.035.